Louisiana, session 2026, HB580.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 51:1429(A) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 51:1429(B)(3)
is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1429. Unfair or deceptive trade practice or act; real estate service agreements for
residential property; recordation on immovable title prohibited
A. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Real estate activity" has the meaning ascribed in R.S. 37:1431.
(1) (2) "Real estate broker" or "real estate salesperson" has the meanings
ascribed to them in R.S. 37:1431.
(2) (3) "Real estate service agreement" means an agreement that does all of
the following:
(a) Grants a right to a person or his designee to act as a real estate broker or
real estate salesperson for the sale of the residential immovable property identified
in the real estate service agreement.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1254 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 580
(b) Provides for compensation to one or more owners of the residential
immovable property identified in the real estate service agreement.
(3) (4) "Residential immovable property" means immovable property
consisting of at least one but not more than four residential dwelling units, which are
buildings or structures, each of which are occupied or intended for occupancy as
single-family residences.
(5) "Seller" means the transferor in a real estate transaction, and includes an
owner who lists real estate with an agent, whether or not a transfer results, or who
receives an offer to purchase or lease real estate property of which he is the owner
from an agent on behalf of another. "Seller" includes a lessor.
B. No person shall do any of the following:
* * *
(3) Conduct real estate activity, including a public advertisement or listing
for sale or lease, that deceives, misleads, or hides a fee or condition from a
prospective buyer or lessee. A fee or condition disclosed only after a prospective
buyer or lessee pays an application fee shall be considered hidden.
* * *